Hawaii, session 2026, GM1170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the federal Coastal
Zone Management Act establishes a national framework for states
and territories to consider when managing coastal resources and
determining potential impacts on those resources. The Act also
authorizes the federal government to provide financial
assistance to support coastal management efforts.
The legislature further finds that the Coastal Zone
Management Act's permitting framework is intended to regulate
special management area development while allowing certain
activities to proceed without unnecessary delay. These
activities, expressly excluded from the statutory definition of
"development", are not intended to be subject to special
management area use permit requirements.
The legislature also finds that it is in the public
interest to streamline the delivery of essential public
infrastructure, which may be accomplished, in part, by creating
a targeted permitting exemption for projects that have been
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx
HMiiuinniiiMiniiii

Page 2 1823
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 2
determined, under chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to be
exempt from the preparation of an environmental assessment or to
have no significant environmental impact.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to apply a
definition of "development", as it pertains to special
management areas, in certain counties of the State to exempt
from special management area use permit requirements all
activities that are not included in that definition, including
certain federal-, state-, or county-funded, authorized, or
implemented infrastructure and improvement projects that are
exempt from an environmental assessment or for which a finding
of no significant impact has been issued.
SECTION 2. Chapter 205A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§205A- Development; certain counties of the State.
(a) Notwithstanding the definition of "development" under
section 205A-22, in counties with a population between one
hundred fifty thousand and two hundred thousand, the definition
of "development" under subsection (b) shall apply.
(b) "Development":
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx

Page 3 1823
H.B. NO.
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D.2
(1) Means any of the uses, activities, or operations on
land or in or under water within a special management
area that are included below:
(A) Placement or erection of any solid material or
any gaseous, liquid, solid, or thermal waste;
(B) Grading, removing, dredging, mining, or
extraction of any materials;
(C) Change in the density or intensity of use of
land, including but not limited to the division
or subdivision of land;
(D) Change in the intensity of use of water, ecology
related thereto, or of access thereto; and
(E) Construction, reconstruction, or alteration of
the size of any structure; and
(2) Does not include the following and the following
should be exempt from special management area use
permit requirements:
(A) Construction or reconstruction of a single-family
residence that is less than seven thousand five
hundred square feet of floor area; is not
situated on a shoreline parcel or a parcel that
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx 3

Page 4
H.B. NO. 2^2
s.D.2
C.D.2
is impacted by waves, storm surges^ high tide, or
shoreline erosion; and is not part of a larger
development;
(B) Repair or maintenance of roads and highways
within existing rights-of-way;
(C) Routine maintenance dredging of existing streams,
channels, and drainage ways;
(D) Repair and maintenance of underground utility
lines, including but not limited to water, sewer,
power, and telephone and minor appurtenant
structures including pad mounted transformers and
sewer pump stations;
(E) Zoning variances, except for height, density,
parking, and shoreline setback;
(F) Repair, maintenance, or interior alterations to
existing structures;
(G) Demolition or removal of structures, except those
structures located on any historic site as
designated in national or state registers;
(H) Use of any land for the purpose of cultivating,
planting, growing, and harvesting plants, crops.
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx 4

Page 5 1823
H.B. NO.
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D.2
trees, and other agricultural^ horticultural, or
forestry products or animal husbandry, or
aquaculture or mariculture of plants or animals,
or other agricultural purposes, including all
traditional fishpond and traditional agricultural
practices;
(I) Transfer of title to land;
(J) Crea±wn or t£rmina tion of ea^ement^j coyenajit^
or other rights in structures or land;
(K) Subdivision of land into lots greater than twenty
acres in size;
(L) Subdivision of a parcel of land into four or
fewer pa^cels wh^n jw a^sociabed con£tructd£n
activities are proposed; provided that any land
that is so subdivided shall not thereafter
qualify for this exception with respect to any
subsequent subdivision of any of the resulting
parcels;
(M) Installation of underground utility lines and
appurtenant aboveground fixtures less than four
feet in height along existing corridors;
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx 5

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(N) Structural and nonstructural improvements to
existing single-family residences^ where
otherwise permissible;
(0) Nonstructural improvements to existing commercial
or noncommercial structures;
(P) Construction, installation, maintenance, repair,
and replacement of emergency management warning
or signal devices and sirens;
(Q) Installation, maintenance, repair, and
replacement of public pedestrian and bicycle
facilities, including sidewalks, paths, bikeways,
crosswalks, stairs, ramps, traffic control
barriers, signs, signals, and associated
improvements;
(R) Trash removal or invasive vegetation removal or
control, including incidental ground disturbance,
excluding the use of herbicides;
(S) Installation of fencing, including associated
improvements and incidental structures, for
invasive species control or preservation of
native habitats on conservation land;
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D.2
(T) Installation, maintenance, repair, and
replacement of lighting, fixtures, and equipment
to establish compliance with current standards at
existing public facilities;
(U) Installation, maintenance, repair, and
replacement of security measures, including
fencing, to existing public facilities;
(V) Hawaiian traditional and customary practices,
including work conducted by traditional means
near, in, or related to loko i‘a, traditional
Hawaiian fishponds;
(W) Reconstruction of any lawfully constructed
structure that was damaged or destroyed in a
disaster proclaimed by the governor to constitute
a state of emergency pursuant to chapter 127A, or
a disaster declared pursuant to federal law;
provided that;
(1) The structure is not situated on a shoreline
parcel or a parcel that is impacted by
waves, storm surges, high tide, or shoreline
erosion;
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
Reconstruction commences within six years
from the date that the proclamation is
issued; and
The reconstructed structure is similar to
its original footprint or overall dimensions
that were existing or permitted and in
compliance with the requirements of
floodplain management standards; and
OO. Federal-, state-, or county-funded, authorized.
or implemented infrastructure and improvement
projects that are exempt from an environmental
assessment or for which a finding of no
significant impact has been issued under chapter
343; provided that for the purposes of this
subparagraph, "infrastructure" includes
waterlines and water facilities; waste waterlines
and wastewater facilities; drainage facilities;
electrical, communications, telephone, and cable
television utilities; and highway, roadway.
bridge, and driveway improvements;
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx 8

Page 9
H.B. NO. Hfi
C.D.2
provided that if the authority finds that any excluded
use, activity^ or operation may have a cumulative
impact, or a significant environmental or ecological
effect on a special management area, that use,
activity, or operation shall be defined as
"development" for the purpose of this part."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval
and shall be repealed on June 30, 2030.
2026-2577 HB1823 CD2 SMA-l.docx 9

H.B. NO. 1823
±
w
d
Q
Q
Q
CM
CM
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1823, HD 2, SD 2, CD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1823, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Kerrate
Clerk of the Senate